Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-403
Administering secret medicine; penalty.

If any physician or other person shall prescribe any drug or medicine to another person, the true nature and composition of which he does not, if inquired of, truly make known, but avow the same to be a secret medicine or composition, thereby endangering the life of such other person, he shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 63.